Utah statutes.
39-5-3.   Owner of property free from liability for injuries to persons or
property during actual, impending, or mock attack.
Any person owning or controlling real estate or other premises who voluntarily
and without compensation grants a license or privilege, or otherwise permits
the designation or use of the whole or any part or parts of such real estate
or premises for the purpose of sheltering persons during an actual, impending,
mock or practice attack, shall, together with his successors in interest, if
any, not be civilly liable for negligently causing the death of, or injury to,
any person on or about such real estate or premises or for loss of, or damage
to, the property of such person.
